Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 20 Interstate Banking and Branching by Merger

7-1-628.
Purpose and scope of part.

It is the purpose of this part to permit interstate banking and branching by merger under Section 102 of the Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994, subject to the limitations and requirements set out in this part and in Parts 14, 18, and 19 of this article.

The scope of this part covers mergers where, upon consummation of the interstate merger transaction, the resulting bank will have banking locations in Georgia and at least one other state. It provides for certain approval, notice, and other requirements.

In authorizing the expansion of interstate banking to this state, and in the interests of its citizens, the General Assembly finds that primary consideration should be given to the following:

Affording protection and promoting convenience to bank depositors and other customers of financial institutions in this state;

Preserving the advantages of a sound dual banking system and the competitive equality of state chartered institutions with federally chartered institutions; and

Providing to the Department of Banking and Finance sufficient powers and responsibilities to implement these considerations.

This part is not intended to discriminate against out-of-state bank holding companies or against foreign bank holding companies in any manner that would violate Section 3(d) of the Bank Holding Company Act, as amended by the Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-21/HB 811; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 21/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 21/HB 891.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “15,” following “Parts 14,” near the end of subsection (a); and substituted “Part 14 of this article” for “Parts 14 and 15 of this article” at the end of the third sentence of subsection (b).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted the former last sentence in subsection (b), which read: “Mergers involving banks having present and resulting branches located only in this state are governed by Part 14 of this article. To the extent a bank participating in an interstate merger transaction is owned or controlled by a bank holding company, the applicable provisions of Part 19 of this article shall also apply.”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was added in three places in paragraph (c)(3).

7-1-628.1.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Bank” shall have the same meaning as “insured bank” in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(h) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, provided that the term “bank” shall not include any “foreign bank” (which is defined as in 12 U.S.C. Section 3101 of the International Banking Act of 1978).

“Bank holding company” shall have the same meaning as set forth in 12 U.S.C. Section 1841(a)(1) of the Bank Holding Company Act.

“Bank supervisory agency” shall mean:

Office of Comptroller of Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, and any successor to those agencies; and

The agency of a state with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising banks.

“Branch” in the context of this part shall have the same meaning as “domestic branch” in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(o) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act. Nothing contained in this part shall be construed to amend or modify the provisions of any other part of this article.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance then in office and, where appropriate, all of his or her successors and predecessors in office.

“Control” means that which is set forth in Code Section 7-1-605.

“Deposits” means, with respect to a bank, all demand, time, and savings deposits of individuals, partnerships, corporations, the United States government, and states and political subdivisions in the United States. Determinations of deposits shall be made by reference to regulatory reports of condition or similar reports filed by such bank with state or federal regulatory authorities.

“Georgia bank” means a bank whose home state is Georgia.

“Georgia bank holding company” means a bank holding company that:

Has its principal place of business in the State of Georgia; and

Is not controlled by a bank holding company other than a Georgia bank holding company.

“Georgia state bank” means a bank chartered under the laws of the State of Georgia.

“Home state” means:

With respect to a state bank, the state by which the bank is chartered;

With respect to a national bank, the state in which the main office of the bank is located; or

With respect to a foreign bank, the state determined to be the home state of the foreign bank under 12 U.S.C. Section 3103(c) of the International Banking Act.

“Home state regulator” means, with respect to an out-of-state state bank, the bank supervisory agency of the state in which such bank is chartered.

“Host state” means a state, other than the home state of a bank, in which the bank maintains or seeks to establish and maintain a branch.

“Insured depository institution” shall have the same meaning as set forth in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(c)(2) and (3) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, provided that the term “insured depository institution” shall not include any “foreign bank” (which is defined as in 12 U.S.C. Section 3101 of the International Banking Act of 1978).

“Interstate merger transaction” means:

The merger or consolidation of banks with different home states and the conversion of branches of any bank involved in the merger or consolidation into branches of the resulting bank; or

The purchase of all or substantially all of the assets of a bank whose home state is different from the home state of the acquiring bank.

“Out-of-state bank” means a bank whose home state is not Georgia, but the term does not include a foreign bank.

“Out-of-state bank holding company” means a bank holding company other than a Georgia bank holding company.

“Out-of-state state bank” means a bank chartered under the laws of a state other than Georgia.

“Principal place of business” of a bank holding company means the state of charter in which the aggregate deposits of the bank subsidiaries of such bank holding company are largest.

“Resulting bank” means a bank that has resulted from an interstate merger transaction under this part.

“State” means any state of the United States, including the District of Columbia.

“Subsidiary” means that which is set forth in Code Section 7-1-605.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 21; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 16; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-22/HB 811.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “Federal Deposit Insurance” was substituted for “FDI” in paragraphs (1), (4), and (14); “article” was substituted for “chapter” in paragraph (4); “banking and finance” was substituted for “the Department of Banking and Finance” in paragraph (5); and “State” was substituted for “state” in subparagraph (9)(A).

7-1-628.2.
Mergers permitted; applicable provisions.

Interstate merger transactions between out-of-state banks and Georgia banks including Georgia state banks shall be permitted provided that the applicable conditions, approvals, and filing requirements are met by participating banks and bank holding companies. The approval procedure for mergers involving banks having offices located only in this state are governed by Part 14 of this article. To the extent a bank participating in a merger is owned or controlled by a bank holding company, the provisions of Part 19 of this article shall also apply to the transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 23; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 22/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “Part 14 of this article” for “Parts 14 and 15 of this article” at the end of the second sentence.

7-1-628.3.
Prohibited interstate merger transactions.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this subsection, an interstate merger transaction shall not be permitted under this part if, upon consummation of such transaction, the resulting bank (including all insured depository institutions that would be “affiliates,” as defined in 12 U.S.C. Section 1841(k) of the resulting bank) would control 30 percent or more of the total amount of deposits held by all insured depository institutions in this state. The 30 percent limitation shall not apply, in the discretion of the commissioner, to transactions complying with paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-623. The commissioner may by regulation adopt a procedure whereby the foregoing limitations on concentration of deposits may be waived upon showing good cause.

An interstate merger transaction shall not be permitted under this part unless the Georgia bank shall have been in existence and continuously operating or incorporated as a bank on the date of such merger or acquisition for a period of at least three years, subject to any applicable exception contained in Code Section 7-1-608.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 23; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 22; Ga. L. 2002, p. 670, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 15/HB 184; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 23/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a).

7-1-628.4.
Permissible interstate merger transactions.

A Georgia state bank may enter into an interstate merger transaction where the Georgia state bank is the resulting bank, and as a result the Georgia state bank may establish, maintain, and operate one or more branches in another state. The Georgia state bank must seek approval for the merger pursuant to the provisions in Part 14 of this article and must comply with federal law.

An out-of-state bank may enter into an interstate merger transaction with a Georgia bank, and an out-of-state bank resulting from such transaction may maintain and operate branches in Georgia. The requirements of Code Section 7-1-628.5 shall be met by the resulting bank. In order to consummate such a merger with a resulting out-of-state state bank, a Georgia state bank shall comply with Code Sections 7-1-531 through 7-1-533 and 7-1-537, except that the format of the articles of merger submitted in accordance with Code Section 7-1-532 may be in conformity with the resulting bank’s home state law if such law requires a format different from that specified by Code Section 7-1-532. A Georgia state bank shall comply with Code Section 7-1-534 if a national bank or a federal savings bank is to be the resulting bank.

Any out-of-state bank which lawfully establishes a branch in this state or which subsequently becomes the owner of or controls interstate branches in Georgia, if such transaction is not covered by subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, shall comply with the requirements in Code Section 7-1-628.5.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 23; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 22/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Code Section 7-1-534” for “Code Section 7-1-556” in the last sentence in subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “article” was substituted for “chapter” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

7-1-628.5.
Requirement for out-of-state bank that is resulting bank of interstate merger transaction.

An out-of-state bank that will be the resulting bank pursuant to an interstate merger transaction involving a Georgia state bank shall notify the commissioner of the proposed merger not later than the date on which it files an application for an interstate merger transaction with the responsible federal bank supervisory agency, provide such information as required by rule or regulation or as the commissioner may otherwise specify, and pay any filing fee required by regulation.

Prior to consummation of an interstate merger between an out-of-state bank and a Georgia state bank, the resulting bank shall provide the commissioner with satisfactory evidence of all required approvals from all relevant bank supervisory agencies.

Prior to consummation of an interstate merger between an out-of-state bank and a Georgia state bank, and continuously thereafter, the out-of-state bank shall maintain deposit insurance issued by a federal public body while it has a branch or any other location in this state.

Any holding company of the resulting bank from an interstate merger transaction between an out-of-state bank and a Georgia state bank shall comply with Part 19 of this article and Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-612.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 24; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-23/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 15/HB 143.

7-1-628.6.
Powers of out-of-state banks branching into Georgia.

An out-of-state state bank which establishes and maintains one or more branches in Georgia under this part may conduct any activities at such branch or branches that are authorized under the law of this state for Georgia state banks.

A Georgia state bank may conduct any activities at any branch outside Georgia that are authorized by Georgia law or that are permissible for a bank chartered by the host state where the branch is located, except to the extent such activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any regulation or order of the commissioner applicable to the Georgia state bank and except where the activity is one that requires approval from the department, in which case such approval must be secured; provided, however, that the commissioner may waive any prohibition or requirement for approval if he or she determines, by order or regulation, that the involvement of out-of-state branches of the Georgia state bank in particular activities would not threaten the safety or soundness of such bank.

An out-of-state bank that has established or acquired a branch in Georgia under this part may establish or acquire additional branches in Georgia to the same extent, but to no greater extent, that any Georgia bank may establish or acquire a branch in Georgia under applicable federal and state law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 25; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 8; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-24/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 9/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted the former last two sentences of subsection (c), which read: “Notification to the department from the bank is required at the same time as the application is made to the federal regulator. A letter describing the transaction shall constitute the required notification and may be written and sent by the bank or the home state regulator.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-628.7.
Examinations and reports; powers of commissioner.

To the extent consistent with subsection (c) of this Code section, the commissioner may make such examinations of any branch established and maintained in this state by an out-of-state state bank as the commissioner may deem necessary to determine whether the branch is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state. The provisions of Parts 3 and 4 of Article 1 of this chapter are applicable to examinations.

The commissioner may prescribe requirements for periodic reports regarding any out-of-state bank that operates a branch in Georgia pursuant to this part. The required reports shall be provided by such bank or by the bank supervisory agency having primary responsibility for such bank. Any reporting requirements prescribed by the commissioner under this subsection shall be: (1) consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to Georgia state banks; and (2) appropriate for the purpose of enabling the commissioner to carry out his or her responsibilities under this Code section.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and information sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any branch in Georgia of an out-of-state state bank or of any branch of a Georgia state bank in any host state, and the commissioner may accept such parties’ reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting his or her own examinations or investigations. Agreements to share should contain provisions for dealing with confidentiality and subpoenas.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a Georgia state bank or an out-of-state state bank operating a branch in this state pursuant to this part to engage the services of such agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, to provide the services of the commissioner’s examiners to such agency at a reasonable rate of compensation, or for another arrangement that the commissioner may find expedient and reasonable.

If appropriate in the discretion of the commissioner and pursuant to an interstate agreement with the pertinent host state regulator for the purpose of facilitating the regulation and supervision of a multistate Georgia state bank, the department may approve and collect from its chartered bank, as agent and home state regulator, examination and supervision fees assessed by a state where the Georgia bank has a branch and may remit such fees to the assessing out-of-state regulator. Such fees shall not be considered revenue payable to the State of Georgia.

In order to facilitate or implement interstate efforts to regulate and supervise a multistate Georgia state bank, the department may adjust its normal supervision examination fee assessment schedule and other rates and charges. Such adjustment may include any examination and supervision fees assessed by host state regulators, pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section, as a part of the standard supervision and examination assessment.

The commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any branch in Georgia of an out-of-state state bank or any branch of a Georgia state bank in any host state, provided that the commissioner may at any time take such actions independently if he or she deems such actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her responsibilities under this part or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state, but provided, further, that, in the case of an out-of-state state bank, the commissioner shall recognize the exclusive authority of the home state regulator over corporate governance matters and safety and soundness matters.

Each out-of-state bank that maintains one or more branches in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of this state and regulations of the department.

Any examinations or reports originated by Georgia or by another bank supervisory agency shall be deemed and treated as confidential according to Georgia law, and such confidentiality shall not be affected by the sharing of the examination or reports. The department shall not be obligated to provide or disclose such examinations or reports to any third party.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 17; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 24/HB 111.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (g).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “and in accordance with safe and sound banking practices” following “state” at the end of the first sentence in subsection (a); and deleted “the primary responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to” following “corporate governance matters and” near the end of subsection (g).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “chapter” was substituted for “title” in the second sentence of subsection (a) and the designations “(1)” and “(2)” were substituted for “(i)” and “(ii)” in subsection (b).

7-1-628.8.
Restrictions on de novo branches.

A “de novo branch” means a branch of a bank which:

Is originally established by the bank as a branch; and

Does not become a branch of the bank as a result of the acquisition of another bank or of a branch of another bank or as the result of the merger, consolidation, or conversion of any such bank or branch.

An out-of-state bank that does not have a branch in Georgia and whose deposits are federally insured may, upon obtaining the necessary approvals from its home state regulator, establish and maintain a de novo branch in this state to the extent that any Georgia bank could establish such a de novo branch.

A Georgia state bank may establish and maintain a de novo branch in another state. Such Georgia state bank shall comply with the provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, obtaining approval from the department prior to establishing the branch.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 24; Ga. L. 2002, p. 670, § 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-25/HB 811; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 25/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (b), which read: “An out-of-state bank that does not have a branch in Georgia and that meets the requirements of this article may establish and maintain a de novo branch in this state to the extent that any Georgia bank could establish such a de novo branch.”

7-1-628.9.
Conditions under which out-of-state bank permitted to establish and maintain branches through in-state acquisition; conditions under which Georgia banks permitted to establish and maintain branches in another state through acquisition.

An out-of-state bank that does not have a branch in Georgia and whose deposits are federally insured may, upon obtaining the necessary approvals from its home state regulator, establish and maintain a branch in this state through the acquisition of a branch.

A Georgia state bank may establish and maintain a branch in another state through the acquisition of a branch in compliance with the provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, obtaining approval from the department prior to acquiring the branch.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-26/HB 811; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 26/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “An out-of-state bank that does not have a branch in Georgia and that meets the requirements of this article may establish and maintain a branch in this state through the acquisition of a branch.”

7-1-628.10.
Enforcement actions by commissioner.

If the commissioner determines that a branch maintained by an out-of-state state bank in this state is being operated in violation of any provision of the laws of this state, the commissioner shall have the authority to take all such enforcement actions as he or she would be empowered to take if the branch were a Georgia state bank, provided that the commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home state regulator of each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state state bank and, to the extent practicable, shall consult and cooperate with the home state regulator in pursuing and resolving said enforcement action.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 27/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “or that such branch is being operated in an unsafe and unsound manner” following “provision of the laws of this state” near the middle of this Code section.

7-1-628.11.
Regulations; administrative fees.

The commissioner may promulgate such regulations and may provide for the payment of such reasonable filing, application, assessment, and administrative fees as he or she determines to be necessary or appropriate in order to implement the provisions of this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2.

7-1-628.12.
Reporting by of out-of-state banks.

In order to determine compliance with Georgia law on deposit concentration limits or other areas of state compliance, reporting by out-of-state banks may be required by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 28/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The commissioner may require an out-of-state state bank that maintains or seeks to establish a branch in this state to submit to the department its consolidated reports of condition and income in the form specified by the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council.”, and substituted “compliance, reporting by out-of-state banks” for “compliance, other reporting of banks” near the end.

7-1-628.13.
[Reserved] Notice of merger, consolidation, or other transaction involving out-of-state bank.

History.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 29/HB 111, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 29/HB 111 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

7-1-628.14.
Severability; construction with other laws.

If any provision of this part or the application of such provision is found by any court of competent jurisdiction in the United States to be invalid as it pertains to any bank, bank holding company, foreign bank, or other person or circumstances, or is found to be superseded explicitly by federal law, the remaining provisions of this part shall not be affected and shall continue to apply to any bank, bank holding company, foreign bank, or other person or circumstance.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed to amend or modify the provisions of any other part of this chapter governing the supervision or regulation of banks and bank holding companies, as defined in this chapter, or with respect to the organization and powers of the department and the commissioner as provided in such other parts.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “part” was substituted for “section” in subsection (a).

7-1-628.15.
Tax treatment.

All banks engaged in interstate banking and branching in this state shall be obliged to adhere to the tax laws and regulations of Title 48 which pertain to such activities.

The Department of Revenue shall address the tax treatment of financial organizations before June 1, 1997, in order to provide timely and appropriate taxation of banks which have adjusted their corporate structures according to this part and federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-628.15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 279, § 2.